District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1207.04

Economic Development Finance Corporation—President.

Repealed.

History

June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-89, § 5, 31 DCR 2514
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 7, 49 DCR 8140

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2214.